Washington statutes.
RCW 14.16.090

Certain aircraft to carry survival kit—Contents—Misdemeanor to operate without—Exceptions.

(1) Any aircraft used to carry persons or property for compensation, or any aircraft that is rented or leased without a pilot shall be equipped with a survival kit consisting of those items prescribed by the department of transportation, which shall include, at least the following: (a) A tube tent or similar sheltering device; (b) a horn, whistle, or similar audible device capable of emitting a signal one-quarter of a mile; (c) a mirror; (d) matches; (e) a candle and/or another fire-starting device; and (f) survival instruction.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate such aircraft without such a survival kit: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing in this section shall apply to: (a) Instructional flights by an air school, with the exception of solo flights by students; (b) aircraft owned by and exclusively in the service of the United States government; (c) aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country; (d) aircraft owned by the manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft; and (e) aircraft used by any air carrier or supplemental air carrier operating in accordance with the provisions of a certificate of public conveyance and necessity under the provisions of the federal aviation act of 1958, Public Law 85-726, as amended.

[ 1987 c 273 s 2.]